Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1208
Exchange of contracts; authorized.

Any corporation organized under the laws of this state, shall, in addition to the rights, powers and franchises specified in its articles of incorporation, have full power and authority to exchange insurance contracts of the kind and character mentioned in section 44-1201. The right to exchange such contracts is hereby declared to be incidental to the purposes for which such corporations are organized, and as much granted as the rights and powers expressly conferred.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 8, p. 461;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 8, p. 684;

C.S.1922, § 7976;

C.S.1929, § 44-1508;

R.S.1943, § 44-1208.